Louisiana, session 2026, HB1078.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3351.17(A) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§3351.17. Distance education; tuition and attendance fees; waivers; public
postsecondary education management boards
A. In addition to the authority granted by any other provision of law,
including but not limited to R.S. 17:3139.5, and in accordance with Article VII,
Section 2.1 of the Constitution of Louisiana, the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana
State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, the Board of Supervisors
of Southern University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, the Board of
Supervisors for the University of Louisiana System, and the Board of Supervisors
of Community and Technical Colleges may impose the following at each institution
under its respective management and supervision: for the Fall 2013 semester and
thereafter tuition
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1078 ENROLLED
(1) Tuition and attendance fees for students enrolled in an undergraduate,
graduate, or professional academic degree program offered entirely through distance
education. as defined by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools when
such program is comparable to a program offered through traditional in-person
classroom instruction.
(2) Tuition and attendance fees for students enrolled in an undergraduate,
graduate, or professional course offered entirely through distance education.
B. The authority granted in Subsection A of this Section shall include the
authority to impose proportional amounts for part-time students and for summer
sessions and academic periods other than semesters or quarters.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.